Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Absentee Voting

2-6-201. Methods of voting absentee.

A registered voter in any of the following circumstances may vote absentee by mail in the procedures outlined in this part:

Persons Outside of County. If the voter will be outside the county where the voter is registered during the early voting period and on election day during all the hours the polls are open for any reason other than the fact that the voter will be imprisoned;

Students and Spouses Outside of County. If a voter is enrolled as a full-time student in an accredited college, university or similar accredited institution of learning in this state which is outside the county where the voter is registered. This provision also applies to the spouse of the student who resides with the student;

Permanent Absentee Voting Register. The county election commission shall establish a permanent absentee voting register for any person who is, because of sickness, hospitalization or physical disability unable to appear at either the commission office or at the person's polling place for the purpose of voting. To be eligible for placement on the register, a voter shall file a statement by the person's licensed physician with the county election commission stating, under the penalty of perjury, that in the physician's professional medical judgment, the patient (voter) is medically unable to appear at the polling place to vote and is medically unable to go to the commission office for the purpose of early voting. The voter shall file the physician's statement and the application not less than seven (7) days before the election. The administrator of elections shall attach the physician's statement to the voter's permanent registration record. Without any further request, the administrator shall send to each person placed on the permanent absentee voting register an application for an absentee ballot for each election in which the person may vote;

Residents of Certain Institutions. In the case of individuals who are full-time residents of any licensed nursing home, home for the aged or similar licensed institution providing relatively permanent domiciliary care, other than a penal institution, outside the voter's county of residence, the procedure for voting shall substantially follow the provisions established in subdivision (3)(A) for voters on the permanent absentee voting register, or the voter may vote under the procedures established in subdivision (1) for voters outside of the county;

Jurors. If an individual expects to be unable to appear during the early voting period or at the polling place on election day because the person is serving as a juror for a federal or state court;

Persons Over 60 — Persons Hospitalized, Ill or Disabled.

A person sixty (60) years of age or older when the person requests to vote absentee;

The person is a voter with a disability as defined in § 2-3-109, and the voter's polling place is inaccessible;

The person is hospitalized, ill or physically disabled, and because of such condition, the person is unable to appear at the person's polling place on election day; or

The person is a caretaker of a hospitalized, ill or disabled person;

Candidates for Office. Without stating any reason therefor, if the voter is a candidate for office in the election for which the voter seeks to cast an absentee ballot;

Election Officials — Election Commission Members or Employees. If the person is an election official or a member or employee of the election commission on election day;

Observance of a Religious Holiday. If the voter cannot appear during the early voting period or at the polling place because of observance of a religious holiday; or

Persons Possessing a Valid Commercial Driver License or Transportation Worker Identification Credential. A voter who possesses a valid commercial driver license or a valid transportation worker identification credential and who certifies that the voter:

Will be working outside of the county or state where the voter is registered during the early voting period and on election day during all the hours the polls are open; and

Has no specific out-of-county or out-of-state location to which mail may be sent or received during such time;

may complete an application to vote absentee by mail at the voter's county election commission office or complete an absentee by-mail application pursuant to §2-6-202(a)(3); provided, that if applicable, such voter satisfies the requirements of §2-2-115(b)(7). In order for the absentee application to be processed, the voter must provide a photocopy of the commercial driver license or transportation worker identification credential, the commercial driver license number on the voter's current commercial driver license, if applicable, and provide a current residential address and a mailing address to which the ballot shall be mailed. This subdivision (9) also applies to the spouse of the person who possesses the commercial driver license.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 399, § 1; 1975, ch. 133, § 1; 1975, ch. 381, § 1; 1978, ch. 814, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 861, §§ 1, 4; 1979, ch. 316, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-602; Acts 1980, ch. 638, §§ 4-6, 8; 1983, ch. 450, § 3; 1985, ch. 90, § 1; 1986, ch. 763, § 1; 1989, ch. 455, § 1; 1990, ch. 731, § 1; 1991, ch. 70, § 1; 1991, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 184, § 3; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 8-10, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-102; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1997, ch. 558, §§ 11, 20; 2003, ch. 33, § 1; 2007, ch. 48, § 3; 2008, ch. 928, § 11; 2012, ch. 1037, § 1; 2013, ch. 231, § 7; 2017, ch. 245, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (5)(A), substituted “sixty (60) years of age” for “sixty-five (65) years of age”, and deleted the former proviso at the end which read: “; provided, however, that between May 21, 2012, and July 1, 2017, a person sixty (60) years of age or older may vote absentee, when the person requests to vote absentee;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 245, § 6. May 2, 2017.

Cross-References. Absentee voting procedure required in runoff election following primary for municipal office, §2-3-206.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

New Kind of Voter Suppression in Modern Elections, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1019 (Summer 2019).

2-6-202. Voting absentee — Applications — Ballots.

A voter who desires to vote absentee shall request an absentee ballot not more than ninety (90) and not later than seven (7) days before the election;

A voter who will be outside of the state on election day and during the period established for early voting may complete an application to vote absentee at the voter's county election commission office;

A voter may also request from the county election commission office an application to vote absentee. A voter may make the request or submit an application to vote by mail, facsimile transmission or e-mail with an attached document that includes a scanned signature. For a voter to use a facsimile transmission, an election commission shall have a facsimile machine physically located in the election commission office. The request shall be in writing over the voter's signature. The request serves as an application for a ballot if the request contains the following information:

The name of the registered voter;

The address of the voter's residence;

The voter's date of birth;

The voter's social security number;

The address to mail the ballot outside the county, if applicable;

The election the voter wishes to participate in; and

The reason the voter wishes to vote absentee.

This subsection (a) does not and may not be construed to require a county election commission to purchase or obtain a facsimile machine.

Upon receipt of a written request, the administrator of elections shall compare the signature of the voter with the signature on the voter's registration record in whatever form. If the signatures are the same and if the required information is provided, the administrator shall mail the voter a ballot in accordance with subsection (d). If the signatures are not the same, the administrator shall reject the application or request. If the required information is not provided, the administrator shall send the voter by mail or facsimile an application for a ballot.

The coordinator of elections shall either supply to a county election commission the forms for applications for ballots or approve the usage of a county's forms.

The election commission shall furnish only one (1) application for absentee voting or one (1) set of absentee voting supplies to any voter unless the voter notifies the commission that the voter has spoiled the application or notifies the commission that the voter has not received the application or voting supplies. If so, the commission shall supply the voter with a subsequent application or supplies. The commission shall note on the records that a subsequent application or supplies have been sent.

A person who is not an employee of an election commission commits a Class E felony if such person gives an application for an absentee ballot to any person.

A person who is not an employee of an election commission commits a Class A misdemeanor if such person gives an unsolicited request for application for absentee ballot to any person.

Unless otherwise required by federal law, the county election commission shall retain a spoiled application for a ballot for six (6) months.

Any information regarding absentee requests and applications shall be confidential and not subject to the open records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7, until the end of the early voting period.

Upon receipt of a completed application, the administrator shall verify the signature of the voter by comparing it with the signature on the voter's registration record in whatever form. The administrator shall make a determination whether the voter's address is different from the address on the voter's permanent registration record or if the registration is in inactive status. If the voter has changed residence, or the voter's registration is inactive, the administrator shall follow the procedures for voting pursuant to § 2-7-140. If the administrator determines that the voter may vote absentee, the administrator shall record the ballot number on the voter's application to vote and mail the voter the following:

Instructions;

One (1) absentee ballot or one (1) primary absentee ballot, or both;

One (1) absentee ballot envelope for each election in which the voter will vote; and

A larger envelope, unsealed, which shall bear upon its face the name and address of the county election commission to which the voter shall mail the completed materials.

An administrator may not mail any of the materials with the address “general delivery.”

An administrator may not process an application for a ballot received after the seventh day before an election.

After receiving the absentee voting supplies and completing the ballot, the voter shall sign the appropriate affidavit under penalty of perjury. The effect of the signature is to verify the information as true and correct and that the voter is eligible to vote in the election. The voter shall then mail the ballot.

The election commission shall furnish only one (1) set of absentee voting supplies to any voter unless the voter notifies the commission that the voter has spoiled the supplies or notifies the commission that the voter has not received the supplies. If so, the commission shall supply the voter with a subsequent set of supplies. The commission shall note on the records that subsequent supplies have been sent. Unless otherwise required by federal law, the county election commission shall retain a spoiled ballot for six (6) months.

Upon receipt by mail of the absentee ballot, the administrator shall open only the outer envelope and compare the voter's signature on the application with the voter's signature on the appropriate registration record. Upon determining that the voter is entitled to vote, the administrator shall note on the voter's absentee ballot envelope that the voter's signature has been verified. This signature verification is the final verification necessary before the counting board counts the ballots. The administrator shall also record that the voter has voted absentee in the election and in every case, including those counties in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, shall record the voter's name on the absentee poll book for each election in which the voter voted. In those counties in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, the administrator shall update the voter's computerized voter history by making the appropriate data entry. The administrator shall then immediately deposit the absentee ballot envelope in the general election absentee ballot box or in the party's primary absentee ballot box as the case may be.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 336, § 1; 1979, ch. 316, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-611; Acts 1980, ch. 638, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 174, § 1; 1983, ch. 450, § 4; 1988, ch. 933, §§ 9, 12, 15; 1988, ch. 993, §§ 3-5; 1989, ch. 455, §§ 2, 3; 1989, ch. 590, § 6; 1991, ch. 69, § 2; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 5, 6, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-111; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1997, ch. 550, § 7; 1997, ch. 558, § 10; 2002, ch. 698, § 1; 2003, ch. 33, § 2; 2007, ch. 125, § 3; 2007, ch. 152, § 1; 2009, ch. 218, § 3; 2011, ch. 412, § 4; 2017, ch. 137, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “if applicable” for “except as provided in §2-6-201(9)” at the end of (a)(3)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 137, § 2. April 17, 2017.

Cross-References. Application for early and absentee voting, §2-6-308.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of application request form by nonemployee of commission permitted, OAG 95-003 (1/6/95).

Provision of official application by nonemployee of commission prohibited, OAG 95-003 (1/6/95).

2-6-203. Filling out application to vote by mail and voter's affidavit.

The voter may have anyone the voter chooses write the voter's request for an absentee ballot or for an absentee voting by mail application or write out the voter's absentee voting by mail application except for the voter's signature or mark.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-613, 2-6-113; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Cross-References. Form of affidavit, §2-6-309.

Form of application, §2-6-308.

2-6-204. Rejected applications and ballots.

If a voter fails to provide required information on an absentee voting by mail application, the administrator shall mark the application “Rejected” and return it to the voter immediately by mail with a red circle marked around the space provided for the required information. The voter may then return the same application after supplying the required information.

If a voter refuses to provide required information on any absentee voting application, the administrator shall mark the application “Rejected” and write the reason for rejection on the application. Notice of rejection shall immediately be given in writing to the applicant.

If the administrator determines that an applicant is ineligible to vote absentee, the administrator shall mark the application “Rejected” and write the reason for rejection on the application. Notice of rejection shall immediately be given in writing to the applicant.

If a county election commission receives an application for an absentee ballot by email with an attached document that includes a scanned signature, the administrator may send a notice of rejection by email with an attached document advising the voter of the reason for the rejection.

If upon receipt of any absentee ballot the administrator determines that the ballot is not entitled to be cast under this title, the administrator shall mark the absentee ballot envelope “Rejected,” write the reason for the rejection on the envelope, and sign it. The absentee ballot envelope, unopened, shall be placed in a container of rejected absentee ballots for the election. Notice of the rejection shall immediately be given in writing to the voter.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-614, 2-6-114; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 2017, ch. 245, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 245, § 6. May 2, 2017.

2-6-205. Absentee voting for voters registered as
nonresident property owners.

In the case of individuals who, pursuant to §2-2-107(a) are registered to vote in a municipality as nonresident property owners, the municipal legislative body may, by ordinance, direct such voters to cast the municipal ballots as absentee by mail ballots. Any municipal ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must be adopted and filed with the county election commission office no later than sixty (60) days before the election. Upon the filing of the municipal ordinance, a nonresident property owner may not thereafter vote in the election except by absentee ballot. No later than forty-five (45) days before the election, the election commission shall mail a notice to each voter registered as a nonresident property owner of the municipality advising the voter of the voting process and include an application for ballot for the municipal election. The election commission shall maintain a record of the municipal ordinance and shall not require a municipality to adopt subsequent ordinances, unless the municipality has repealed such ordinance since the last election.

Acts 2011, ch. 412, § 5.

2-6-206. Absentee ballots for person participating in address confidentiality program.

The following shall apply to registered voters who are participants in the address confidentiality program in accordance with title 40, chapter 38, part 6:

Following certification as a program participant by the secretary of state, and without any further request, the administrator of elections shall send to each person participating in the address confidentiality program an application for an absentee ballot for each election in which the person may vote. A voter may submit an application to vote by mail, facsimile transmission, or email with an attached document that includes a scanned signature;

The application shall contain the following information:

The voter's address confidentiality program participant identification number;

The election the voter wishes to participate in;

A statement confirming that the voter's residence address on file with the address confidentiality program has not changed; and

The voter's signature; and

Without any further request, the administrator of elections shall compare the signature of the voter with the signature on the voter's registration record in whatever form. If the signatures are the same and if the required information is provided, the administrator shall mail the voter a ballot to the address the voter requested. If no address is requested then the absentee ballot shall be mailed to the substitute address listed with the secretary of state. If the signatures are not the same, the administrator shall reject the application or request. If the required information is not provided, the administrator shall send the voter by mail or facsimile an application for a ballot.

Acts 2018, ch. 1004, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1004, § 4 provided that the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement the provisions of this act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1004, § 5. March 1, 2019; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

2-6-207. Assistance by person convicted of voter fraud prohibited.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person convicted of voter fraud in any state shall not assist a person in voting by absentee ballot.

Acts 2019, ch. 271, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 271, § 5. April 30, 2019.